Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5729.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6230. As used in this part: (a) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (b) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her the director's designee. (c) "Substance use disorder prevention services" means that term as defined in section 100d of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100d. (d) (c) "Substance use disorder services" means substance use disorder prevention services or substance use disorder treatment and rehabilitation services, or both. , as those terms are defined in section 100d of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100d. (e) "Substance use disorder services program" means a program offering 1 or more substance use disorder services. (f) "Substance use disorder treatment and rehabilitation services" means that term as defined in section 100d of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100d. Sec. 6233. (1) A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), a person not otherwise licensed to provide psychological, medical, or social services shall not establish, conduct, or maintain a substance use disorder services program unless it is licensed under this part. (2) The department shall establish a licensing unit to administer the licensing functions of this part. (3) The following are not required to hold a license under this part to establish, conduct, or maintain a substance use disorder services program: (a) A hospital licensed under article 17. (b) A psychiatric hospital or psychiatric unit licensed under section 134 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1134. (c) A crisis stabilization unit as that term is defined in section 100a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100a. (4) (3) This section does not apply to a private, nonprofit organization exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, that has been in existence since before September 30, 1965, and whose major purpose is to provide residential services for the redirection and improvement of drug abusers and other character disordered individuals. Sec. 6234. (1) The department may promulgate rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969 for the administration of this part and the licensing of substance use disorder services programs under this part. Rules promulgated under former section 6231 relating to the licensing of substance use disorder services programs remain effective and applicable on and after the effective date of this section until rules are promulgated by the department under this section. (2) The rules applicable to substance use disorder services programs must be uniform insofar as is reasonable. (3) The rules must establish standards relating to all of the following: (a) The specific categories of substance use disorder services covered by a license for a substance use disorder services program under this part. (b) The organization and function of the substance use disorder services program, its owner, its operator, and its governing body. (c) Administration. (d) Professional and nonprofessional staff, services, and equipment needed to provide substance use disorder services. (e) Policies and procedures. (f) Fiscal and medical audit. (g) Utilization and quality control review. (h) Physical plant, including sanitation, maintenance, housekeeping, and fire safety. (i) Arrangements for the continuing evaluation of the quality of the substance use disorder services that are provided. (j) Other pertinent organizational, operational, and procedural requirements for each substance use disorder services program. Sec. 6238. (1) A standard license issued under this part is effective for no longer than 1 year after the date of issuance. The department may issue a provisional license to an applicant temporarily unable to comply with this part or the rules promulgated under this part. The department may renew or extend a provisional license issued under this section for not more than 1 year. The department may issue a temporary, nonrenewable permit for not more than 90 days if additional time is needed for the department to properly investigate or for the applicant to undertake remedial action. (2) The department shall make at least 1 visit to each licensed substance use disorder services program every 3 years for survey and evaluation for the purpose of licensure. (3) The department may waive the visit required by subsection (2) if the licensed substance use disorder services program requests a waiver and submits the following: (a) Evidence that it is currently fully accredited by an accrediting body with expertise in the health facility type and the accrediting organization is accepted by the department. (b) A copy of the most recent accreditation executive summary submitted to the department at least 30 days from licensure renewal. Submission of an executive summary does not prevent or prohibit the department from requesting the entire accreditation report if the department considers it necessary. (4) Accreditation information provided to the department under subsection (3) is confidential, is not a public record, and is not subject to court subpoena. The department shall use the accreditation information only as provided in this section. The department shall properly destroy the documentation after a decision on the waiver request is made. (5) The department shall grant a waiver under subsection (3) if the accreditation report submitted is less than 3 years old and there is no indication of substantial noncompliance with licensure standards or of deficiencies that represent a threat to public safety or patient care in the accreditation report. (6) Denial of waiver request by the department is not subject to appeal. (7) This section does not prohibit the department from conducting an inspection or citing a violation of this part related to a complaint.